Utah statutes.
59-22-305.   Releasing parties.
"Releasing Parties," which is referenced in Subsection 59-22-202(8), is
defined in the Master Settlement Agreement as follows:
(1)  "Releasing Parties" means each Settling State and any of its past,
present and future agents, officials acting in their official capacities,
legal representatives, agencies, departments, commissions and divisions; and
also means, to the full extent of the power of the signatories hereto to
release past, present and future claims, the following:  (1)  any Settling
State's subdivisions, political or otherwise, including, but not limited to,
municipalities, counties, parishes, villages, unincorporated districts and
hospital districts, public entities, public instrumentalities and public
educational institutions; and (2) persons or entities acting in a parens
patriae, sovereign, quasi-sovereign, private attorney general, qui tam,
taxpayer, or any other capacity, whether or not any of them participate in
this settlement, (A) to the extent that any such person or entity is seeking
relief on behalf of or generally applicable to the general public in such
Settling State or the people of the State, as opposed solely to private or
individual relief for separate and distinct injuries, or (B) to the extent
that any such entity, as opposed to an individual, is seeking recovery of
health-care expenses, other than premium or capitation payments for the
benefit of present or retired state employees, paid or reimbursed, directly or
indirectly, by a Settling State.
